District of Columbia statutes.
22-404.02

Assault on a public vehicle inspection officer.

(a)

A person commits the offense of assault on a public vehicle inspection officer if that person assaults, impedes, intimidates, or interferes with a public vehicle inspection officer while that officer is engaged in or on account of the performance of his or her official duties.

(b)

A person who violates this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall:

(1)

Be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or be imprisoned for not more than 180 days; and

(2)

Have his or her license or licenses for operating a public vehicle-for-hire, as required by the Commission pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 3 of Title 50 [§ 50-301 et seq.], revoked without further administrative action by the Commission.

(c)

It is neither justifiable nor excusable for a person to use force to resist the civil enforcement authority exercised by an individual believed to be a public vehicle inspection officer, whether or not such enforcement action is lawful.

(d)

For the purposes of this section, the term:

(1)

“Commission” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 50-303(6).

(2)

“Public vehicle-for-hire” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 50-303(17).

(3)

“Public vehicle inspection officer” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 50-303(19).

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1322, ch. 854, § 806b
as added June 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-320, § 401, 60 DCR 3390

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-320 added this section.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 401 of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-44, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5381, 20 DCSTAT 1281).
For temporary addition of the Act of Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1322, ch. 854, § 806b, concerning assault on a public vehicle inspection officer, see § 401 of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendments Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-599, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1017).